Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 4

Removal of County Seat

5-4-101. Vote required for removal.

Where an old county is reduced for the purpose of forming a new one, the seat of justice in the old county shall not be removed without the concurrence of two thirds (2/3) of both branches of the general assembly, nor shall the seat of justice of any county be removed without the concurrence of two thirds (2/3) of the qualified voters of the county.

Const. 1870, art. 10, § 4; Shan., § 112; Code 1932, § 131; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-401.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties to include total registered voters, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Constitutional provisions, Tenn. Const., art. X, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 10.

5-4-102. Order of election.

The county legislative body may at any regular meeting, a majority of the members concurring, order an election to ascertain if the people desire the county seat to be removed.

Acts 1881, ch. 98, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 114; mod. Code 1932, § 132; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 12, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-402.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 10.

5-4-103. Balloting procedure.

Each voter shall put on such voter's ballot the name of the place to which such voter desires the county seat removed or mark the words “no removal.”

Acts 1873, ch. 103, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 436; Shan., § 117; Code 1932, § 135; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-405.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 10.

5-4-104. Counting of votes — Removal.

The county election commission shall make its return to the county mayor, and at the next regular meeting of the county legislative body after the election, the vote shall be counted and the result declared.

If the proposition to remove the county seat received the requisite number of votes, then the county legislative body shall proceed to make all necessary provisions for the removal.

Acts 1873, ch. 103, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 436; Shan., § 118; Code 1932, § 136; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 12, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-406; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 10.

5-4-105. Sale of old courthouse.

When a county seat is removed, the members of the county legislative body shall order a sale of the old courthouse and ground belonging to it, upon such terms as they think most for the interest of the county, and shall apply the proceeds of the sale to the payment for a new courthouse.

Code 1858, § 418 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 11, § 2); Shan., § 510; Code 1932, § 762; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-407.

Cross-References. Relocation or replacement of courthouse or jail, § 5-7-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 10.